Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 1
GENERAL

40-20-101. Certificate of incorporation.

Any number of persons, not less than five, may associate to form a company for the purpose of constructing and operating a railroad.

The certificate of incorporation, in addition to the matter otherwise required, shall specify as follows:

The places from and to which it is intended to construct the proposed railway;

The time of the commencement and the period of the continuance of such proposed corporation;

The names and places of residence of the several persons forming the association for incorporation; and

In what officers or persons the government of the proposed corporation and the management of its affairs shall be vested.

Source:

G.L.

§ 298.

G.S.

§ 333.

R.S. 08:

§ 5410.

C.L.

§ 2815.

CSA:

C. 139, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-1.

L. 69:

p. 966, § 1.

Cross references:

For the disposition of unclaimed freight, see article 13 of title 38; for lien on goods and baggage, see § 38-20-105; for the assessment of railroad property for the purpose of taxation, see article 4 of title 39; for provisions applicable to public utilities generally, see articles 1 to 9.5 of this title.

40-20-102. Powers of corporation.

Every such corporation, in addition to the powers conferred in articles 101 to 117 of title 7, C.R.S., has the power:

To lay out its road, not exceeding two hundred feet in width, and to construct the same; and for the purpose of cuttings and embankments to take as much more land as may be necessary for the proper construction and security of the railway; and to cut down any standing trees that may be in danger of falling or obstructing the railway, making proper compensation therefor;

To cross, intersect, or connect its railway with any other railway;

To connect at the state line with railroads of other states and territories;

To receive and convey persons and property on its railway;

To erect and maintain all buildings and stations, fixtures, and machinery necessary and convenient for the accommodation, and use of passengers, freights, and business interests or which may be necessary for the construction or operation of said railway;

To regulate the time and manner in which passengers and property shall be transported and the compensation to be paid therefor;

From time to time, to borrow such sums of money as may be necessary for completing, finishing, improving, or operating any such railway, and to issue and dispose of its bonds for any amount so borrowed, and to mortgage its corporate property and franchise to secure the payment of any debt contracted by such corporation for such purposes, in such manner as the shareholders representing a majority of the stock of any such corporation may direct;

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to invest in any of the following if such investment is consistent with sound investment policy:

Any public-private initiative with the department of transportation, as defined in section 43-1-1201 (3), C.R.S.;

Bonds issued for turnpikes in accordance with part 2 of article 3 of title 43, C.R.S.;

Repealed.

Any other public-private initiative program for transportation system projects in Colorado authorized by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 301.

G.S.

§ 336.

R.S. 08:

§ 5411.

C.L.

§ 2816.

CSA:

C. 139, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-2.

L. 93:

IP(1) amended, p. 866, § 45, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 98:

(1)(h) added, p. 447, § 9, effective August 5.

L. 2005:

(1)(h)(III) repealed, p. 290, § 42, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act enacting subsection (1)(h), see section 1 of chapter 154, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.

40-20-103. Right-of-way for changed line - sale of right-of-way for public passenger rail service - definitions.

Any railroad company having located its line of road, whether the same is completed or not, may make a new location of its line and may acquire the right-of-way for such new line in the same manner as is now provided for acquiring the right-of-way by the statutes of Colorado; but in acquiring said new right-of-way, the previous right-of-way shall revert to the owner of the land through which said previous right-of-way was granted upon the payment or tendering payment to the railroad company of the amount assessed by the board of appraisers and paid by said railroad company for said previous right-of-way.

Any railroad company may sell its right-of-way for the operation of a public passenger rail service. In such case, the right-of-way shall continue to be used as a public highway only for operation of public passenger rail service for purposes of section 4 of article XV of the state constitution if ownership of the right-of-way is transferred to a public passenger rail service provider, regardless of:

Whether or not an order of abandonment has been issued for the right-of-way by the federal surface transportation board, any successor federal agency, or any court of competent jurisdiction;

The technology used to operate the public passenger rail service; or

Whether ownership of the railroad is public or private.

No rail service provider operating public passenger rail service as authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be required to offer its right-of-way for use by any other rail service provider by operation of Colorado law after an order of abandonment has been issued.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any vested right of any party.

For purposes of this section, "public passenger rail service" means any passenger service that runs on rails or electromagnetic guideways, including but not limited to:

Commuter or other short-haul railroad passenger service in a metropolitan or suburban area;

High-speed ground transportation systems that connect metropolitan areas; or

Rapid transit operations in an urban area that are not connected to the general railroad system of transportation.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 224, § 1.

G.L.

§ 2234.

G.S.

§ 2795.

R.S. 08:

§ 5519.

C.L.

§ 2902.

CSA:

C. 139, § 88.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-3.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1276), ch. 201, p. 875, § 1, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For procedure in eminent domain, see articles 1 to 7 of title 38.

40-20-104. May guarantee bonds and interest.

It is lawful for any railroad company organized, existing, or doing business in the state of Colorado under the laws of the state of Colorado, upon good consideration, to guarantee the payment of any mortgage, mortgage bonds, or interest coupons of any other railroad connecting with said first named railroad. It is also lawful for any such railroad, upon good consideration, to guarantee to said road the payment of interest upon its capital stock.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 369, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5412.

C.L.

§ 2817.

CSA:

C. 139, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-4.

40-20-105. Construction started within two years.

If any railway corporation, within two years after its articles of association have been filed and recorded, does not begin the construction of its road and expend thereon twenty percent of the amount of its capital within five years after the date of its organization, its corporate existence and power shall cease; but any such railway corporation at any time may reduce its capital stock in the manner and form provided by the laws of this state, and if twenty percent of the amount of its capital, as so reduced, has at any time been expended in good faith in the construction of its road, then its corporate existence and power shall not cease or be deemed to have ceased.

Source:

G.L.

§ 303.

G.S.

§ 337.

L. 1889:

p. 95 § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5413.

C.L.

§ 2818.

CSA:

C. 139, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-5.

40-20-106. Directors - election.

At any meeting of the stockholders of any railroad corporation formed under the laws of this state for the election of directors, managers, or trustees, the stockholders may classify the directors in three equal classes, as near as may be, one of which classes shall hold office for one year, one for two years, and one for three years until its successors are respectively elected; and at all subsequent elections, in the event such classification is made, directors shall be elected for three years to fill the places made vacant by the class whose term of office expires at that time.

Source:

G.L.

§ 319.

G.S.

§ 362.

R.S. 08:

§ 5414.

C.L.

§ 2819.

CSA:

C. 139, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-6.

Cross references:

For provisions regarding directors and their election, see part 1 of article 108 of title 7.

40-20-107. Stockholders to fix interest and loans.

At all general meetings of the stockholders, those holding a majority in the value of the stock of any such corporation may fix the rates of interest which shall be paid by the corporation for loans for the construction of such railway and its appendages and the amount of such loans.

Source:

G.L.

§ 300.

G.S.

§ 335.

R.S. 08:

§ 5415.

C.L.

§ 2820.

CSA:

C. 139, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-7.

40-20-108. Purchase or lease of other lines - sale.

Any railroad company owning or operating, or formed to own or operate, a line of railroad in this state may lease or purchase other lines of railroad within or without this state which shall connect with the road operated or to be operated by such company, directly or by means of any other line which such company has the right by contract or otherwise, when constructed, to use or operate, and may acquire and may hold the obligations and stock of other companies owning or operating any such line of railroad which such company is so authorized to lease or purchase or with which, under the laws of the state of Colorado, it may be authorized to consolidate, and any railroad corporation may lease or sell its line of railroad to any other company authorized to lease or purchase the same. No line of railroad shall be so leased, purchased, or sold until a meeting of the stockholders of the companies party to such agreement of lease or sale has been called for that purpose in such manner as provided for the annual stockholders' meeting, and the holders of at least two-thirds of the stock of such companies consent thereto or, in the case of a foreign corporation, unless the consent thereto of the stockholders has been obtained to the extent required and in the manner provided by the laws of the place of incorporation. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize the lease, purchase, or sale of competing or parallel lines or to exclude the jurisdiction of this state over the control or regulation of all railroads or parts of the same as are situated within the boundaries of this state.

Source:

L. 1899:

p. 313, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5418.

C.L.

§ 2821.

L. 27:

p. 580, § 1.

CSA:

C. 139, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-8.

Cross references:

For the call of stockholders' meeting, see §§ 7-107-102 and 7-107-103.

40-20-109. Dining cars need no license.

No person or corporation shall be required to obtain or pay any town, city, county, or state license or tax within the state of Colorado by reason of furnishing or serving to passengers upon any railroad train meals, luncheons, or refreshments in any hotel car, dining car, or buffet car operated by such person or corporation.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 260, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5521.

C.L.

§ 2904.

CSA:

C. 139, § 90.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-9.

40-20-110. Title to equipment.

In any written contract for the sale of railroad equipment or rolling stock, deliverable immediately or subsequently, at stipulated periods, by the terms of which the purchase money, in whole or in part, is to be paid in the future, it may be agreed that the title to the property so sold or contracted to be sold shall not pass to or vest in the vendee until the purchase money has been fully paid or that the vendor shall retain a lien thereon for the unpaid purchase money, notwithstanding delivery thereof to and possession by the vendee for a period not to exceed twenty-five years in any one contract, which terms shall be expressed in said contract; but the situs or location of all such property shall, for the purposes of taxation and revenue, be deemed to be within the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 302, § 1.

L. 05:

p. 305, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5523.

C.L.

§ 2906.

CSA:

C. 139, § 92.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-10.

40-20-111. Lease may stipulate sale.

In any written contract for the leasing or renting of railroad equipment or rolling stock, it is lawful to stipulate for a conditional sale thereof at the termination of such lease and to stipulate that the rentals received, as paid or when paid in full, may be applied and treated as purchase money and that the title to such property shall not vest in such lessee or vendee until the purchase money has been paid in full, notwithstanding delivery to and possession by such lessee or vendee.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 303, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5524.

C.L.

§ 2907.

CSA:

C. 139, § 93.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-11.

40-20-112. Execution of contract.

Every such contract, specified in sections 40-20-110 and 40-20-111, shall be good, valid, and effectual, both in law and equity, against all purchasers and creditors, provided:

The contract is acknowledged by the vendee or lessee before some officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds;

Such instrument is recorded or a copy thereof filed in the office of the secretary of state and in the office of the county clerk and recorder of each of the counties in which the railroad may be operated in this state;

Each locomotive engine or car so sold or contracted to be sold or leased has the name of the vendor or lessor or the assignee of such vendor or lessor plainly placed or marked on each side thereof or otherwise marked so as to indicate the ownership thereof or that the same is covered by such special contract.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 303, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 5525.

C.L.

§ 2908.

CSA:

C. 139, § 94.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-12.

40-20-113. Acknowledgments.

The acknowledgments of such contracts may be made in the form required as to conveyances of real estate.

Source:

L. 1885:

p. 303, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 5527.

C.L.

§ 2910.

CSA:

C. 139, § 96.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-13.

Cross references:

For form of real estate conveyance acknowledgments, see § 38-35-101.

40-20-114. Term of existence - renewal.

No such corporation shall be formed to continue more than fifty years in the first instance, but such corporation may be renewed from time to time, in such manner as may be provided by law, for periods not longer than fifty years.

Source:

G.L.

§ 299.

G.S.

§ 334.

R.S. 08:

§ 5419.

C.L.

§ 2822.

CSA:

C. 139, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 116-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 116-1-14.